Missouri, session 2026, HB3442.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 210.128, to read as follows:
210.128. 1. The department of social services shall maintain a state repository of
all reports of abuse and neglect. The purpose of such state repository, among other uses,
is to provide information of past reports of child abuse or neglect to assist in the proper
evaluation of current reports of child abuse or neglect, which may include a pattern of
incidents.
2. (1) Within the state repository, the department of social services shall
maintain a state central registry of certain substantiated reports of child abuse or
neglect as set forth in rules promulgated by the department.
(2) The name of an individual who is determined to be a perpetrator of child
abuse or neglect shall not be placed on the state central registry until that individual's
administrative appeals are exhausted.
(3) All decisions rendered by an administrative law judge are final, and the
decisions shall exhaust the individual's administrative remedy. However,
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department of social services shall
immediately provide information involving an investigation from either the repository
or the state central registry to the local prosecuting attorney's office, or such attorney's
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3442 2
designee, or to the court when court action is necessary to protect a child from abuse or
neglect.
(4) The department of social services shall provide information involving an
open investigation or a completed investigation determined to be substantiated from
either the repository or the state central registry to another state's child welfare agency
upon written request when the request is made under an ongoing child protective
services investigation in the other state.
3. Except as provided in this section or section 210.150, all records of reports of
child abuse or neglect are confidential. The department of social services shall
promulgate rules regarding the maintenance, deletion, and release of information in the
state repository or central registry.
4. Upon the written request of a court during the court's evaluation of any of the
following individuals who will have contact with children served by a court-appointed
special advocate (CASA) program, and with the consent of the individual, the
department shall search the central registry and report to the court any substantiated
report of child abuse or neglect alleging that the individual is a perpetrator:
(1) An individual applying to work as a court-appointed special advocate;
(2) A CASA staff member; or
(3) A member of the CASA board of directors.
5. If, after an investigation, a determination is made by the department of social
services that the report appears to be substantiated, any subsequent adjudication by a
court exercising juvenile jurisdiction that dismisses the child in need of care petition
involving such report shall be added to the central registry.
6. Information from investigations of reports that are inconclusive may be
disclosed, with the applicant's written consent, for the limited purposes of evaluating the
applicant to be a foster parent, an adoptive parent, or caregiver.
7. Any violation of the confidentiality provisions of this section or the lawful
regulations of the department of social services subjects an offender to criminal
prosecution authorized under section 210.165.
8. The department of social services may charge a fee that shall not exceed
twenty-five dollars to conduct a search of the state central registry of substantiated child
abuse or neglect reports to determine whether an individual's name is recorded in the
registry. A search shall be allowed only when specifically authorized.
9. The department of social services shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the

HB 3442 3
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔